Utah statutes.
16-16-116.   Dual capacity.

A person may have both a patron member's interest and an investor member's interest.  When such person acts as a patron member, the person is subject to this chapter and the organic rules governing patron members.  When such person acts as an investor member, the person is subject to this chapter and the organic rules governing investor members.



Enacted by Chapter 363, 2008 General Session

